Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6146.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-8-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-8 entitled "Burglary and
Breaking and Entering" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-8-8. Injury or death — Defense.
(a) In the event that any person shall die or shall sustain a personal injury in any way or for
any cause while in the commission of any criminal offense enumerated in §§ 11-8-2 — 11-8-6, or
11-39-2, it shall be rebuttably presumed as a matter of law in any civil or criminal proceeding that
the owner, tenant, or occupier of the place where the offense was committed acted by reasonable
means in self-defense and in the reasonable belief that the person engaged in the criminal offense
was about to inflict great bodily harm or death upon that person or any other individual lawfully in
the place where the criminal offense was committed. There shall be no duty on the part of an owner,
tenant, or occupier to retreat from any person engaged in the commission of any criminal offense
enumerated in §§ 11-8-2 — 11-8-6, or 11-39-2.
(b) In the event that any person shall die or shall sustain a personal injury in any way or for
any cause while in the commission of any violent criminal offense against a person if that person
is lawfully in a place they have a right to be, it shall be rebuttably presumed as a matter of law in
any civil or criminal proceeding that the owner, tenant, or occupier of the place where the violent
offense was committed acted by reasonable means in self-defense and in the reasonable belief that
the person engaged in the criminal offense was about to inflict great bodily harm or death upon that
person or any other individual lawfully in the place where the criminal offense was committed.

There shall be no duty on the part of an owner, tenant, or occupier to retreat from any person
engaged in the commission of any violent criminal offense if that person is lawfully in a place they
have a right to be.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002618
========
LC002618 - Page 2 of 3